Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

Establishment

54-12-101. Power to establish road improvement districts.

The monthly county court is vested with the power at any regular, special, or adjourned session to establish road improvement districts for the purpose of building and maintaining public roads in the road improvement districts, and building bridges, culverts, and levees on the roads and to locate and establish the roads, or provide for these things being done whenever they are of public utility or conducive to the public welfare.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 1; 1921, ch. 147, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1682a10; Code 1932, § 2823; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1301.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Comparative Legislation. Road Improvement Districts:

Ala. Code § 23-1-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 14-318-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-4-22.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 184.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-19-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 233.010 et seq.

Va. Code § 15.2-2318 et seq.

Collateral References. 39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets, and Bridges § 86 et seq.

39A C.J.S. Highways § 144 et seq.

Highways
90 et seq.

54-12-102. Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court.

In each county, the body that is authorized to perform the duties vested in the monthly county court in this chapter shall be the entity to which the duties of the former monthly county court in each county were transferred after 1978, and all references in this chapter to the monthly county court shall be deemed a reference to the successor entity, unless otherwise stated.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1682a11; Code 1932, § 2824; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1302.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was rewritten in 1988 by authority of the Code Commission.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Power to establish road improvement districts, § 54-12-101.

54-12-103. Petition for road improvement district.

Before any monthly county court establishes a road improvement district as defined in § 54-12-101, a petition, signed by twenty-five percent (25%) of the landowners in the district who will be affected by or liable to be assessed for the expenses of the proposed improvement, shall be filed in the office of county clerk in which the improvement is to be made.

The petition shall describe the lands proposed to be included in the district by metes and bounds, or otherwise so as to convey intelligible description of the lands, and likewise the termini and general location of the road or roads shall be given in the petition. Likewise, the petition shall allege that the roads proposed are for the public benefit and utility. The petition shall have other allegations necessary to give the court a clear understanding of the necessity for the proposed road and the benefits it will be to the public.

An attorney may sign the names of the landowners to the petition as in other cases.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1682a12; Code 1932, § 2825; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1303; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-104. Bond for costs and expenses — Increase in penalty or security.

There shall be filed with the petition a bond, with adequate security in a penal sum that the county clerk deems adequate, to be approved by the county clerk, and conditioned for the payment of the costs and expenses of this proceeding, provided the prayer of the petition is not granted, or the petition is dismissed for any cause.

The county court may at any time have the bond increased in penalty or security.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1682a13; Code 1932, § 2826; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1304; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-105. Road improvement district confined to boundaries of county.

The bounds proposed to be embraced in the improvement district shall not go beyond the boundaries of the county in which the petition is filed, and the petition shall be accompanied by a general plat showing the location of the improvement district and the relation to the lines of the county in which it is created.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1682a14; Code 1932, § 2827; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1305.

54-12-106. Petitioners may employ counsel in preliminary matters — Compensation for services, fixing.

The petitioners for the improvement district are authorized to employ counsel to assist in filing the petition and in all preliminary matters necessary in having the district established, and attending to the matters of the district, so far as may be necessary, and so far as the monthly county court may think needed after the district is ordered established, contracting with the attorneys for the amount to be paid for their services, which contract shall be ratified and approved by the monthly county court, if deemed reasonable.

If not reasonable, the monthly county court shall, by order, fix the amount to be allowed for legal services, fixing the amount as it deems reasonable and proper.

The amount of fees fixed for legal services shall become a debt and charge against the district as other preliminary expenses are, such as charges for services of an engineer, etc., and to be paid in like manner.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 110; Shan. Supp., § 1682a124; Code 1932, § 2939; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1306.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Attorney's compensation for services in connection with assessments, amount of. 143 A.L.R. 828, 56 A.L.R.2d 13, 57 A.L.R.3d 475, 57 A.L.R.3d 550, 58 A.L.R.3d 317, 10 A.L.R.5th 448, 17 A.L.R.5th 366, 23 A.L.R.5th 241, 86 A.L.R. Fed. 866.

54-12-107. Committee for petitioners in preliminary matters in establishing district — Compensation.

The petitioners are authorized to select from their number a committee of three (3) or five (5), as they deem expedient, which committee shall act for the petitioners in all preliminary matters as their services may be needed in having the district established, and which committee shall have the power to bind the petitioners in all preliminary matters looking to the establishment of the district.

This committee shall elect out of its members officers it deems necessary, and shall keep a record of the committee's proceedings.

The members of this committee shall receive for service compensation as fixed by the monthly county court, and paid out of the funds of the district when established in the same way as is provided for the payment of other just charges against the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 111; Shan. Supp., § 1682a125; Code 1932, § 2940; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1307.

54-12-108. Contents of petition — Hearing — Publication for landowner defendants.

The court shall set a day for a hearing, and direct publication be made for all landowners set out in the petition who are not petitioners, when:

A petition is filed with all the necessary allegations, and the petition is sworn to, by one (1) or more of the petitioners, and shows that sixty percent (60%) in acres of the land within the boundaries of the district sought to be created is owned by the petitioners;

The petition is accompanied by a general plat, and a general description of the district sought to be created;

A description by surrounding landowners is given in the petition of the respective tracts of land, within the bounds, and the names of the owners of the tracts who are not petitioners, are set out in the petition;

The petitioners ask that provision be made for funds to defray the preliminary costs and expenses up to that stage in the proceedings where the report of the commissioners for the assessment of benefits has been filed and confirmed; and

The monthly county court deems it expedient that provisions should be made for a fund to cover the preliminary costs and expenses.

Publication shall be made in some newspaper published in the county in which the district is located, and if located in more than one (1) county, then in a newspaper in each county, the publications to be for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the day set for the hearing. The publication shall notify the landowners of the pending suit, and the prayer for the creation of a fund to pay the preliminary costs and expenses, and the day fixed for the hearing, and notify them to appear and show cause why an assessment to create the fund should not be made.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1682a15; Code 1932, § 2828; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1308.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

“Owner,” scope and import of term in statutes as to giving notice of making of local improvement. 2 A.L.R. 790, 95 A.L.R. 1085.

54-12-109. Objections, filing — Assessment for preliminary costs and expenses — Decree.

The landowners shall make their appearance and file their objections, if any, on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day set for hearing.

After the hour fixed for the filing of objections, the monthly county court shall proceed to hear and determine the matter of making an assessment to raise a fund for the payment of the preliminary costs and expenses.

The court will determine from the proof offered, approximately, the amount necessary to cover the cost and expenses, and if the court is of the opinion that it is not expedient to make an assessment for those purposes, the court shall so decree; but if the court is of the opinion that it is expedient, the court shall make an assessment for the amount determined upon the respective tracts of land set out in the petition, and make the assessment on the basis of acreage.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1682a16; Code 1932, § 2829; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1309.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-110. Appeal from decision.

Any party aggrieved may appeal from the decision of the monthly county court in making the assessment, or refusing to make the assessment.

The appeal shall be made in the same manner and upon the same terms provided for appeals from the action of the monthly county court in creating or refusing to create a road improvement district as provided in §§ 54-12-141 — 54-12-149.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1682a16½; Code 1932, § 2830; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1310.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-111. Collection dates fixed upon assessment being made — Assessment list certified to trustee to collect — Compensation.

When the assessment has been made, the monthly county court shall fix the dates within which the assessment shall be collected, and the county clerk shall make out an assessment list or book, giving alphabetically the name of the owner, and the boundaries of the land, the number of acres, and the amount assessed against each tract, and the county clerk will make the same substantially in the form used for state and county tax books, and when so made, the county clerk shall certify the same to the trustee of the county, and it is the duty of the trustee to proceed at once to collect the assessments within the dates prescribed by the court; and the trustee will pay the amount collected on the assessments to the county clerk, to be paid out by the county clerk on the costs and expenses under the orders of the court, and for collecting, and paying over the assessments, the trustee shall be allowed as compensation two percent (2%) of the amount collected and paid over.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1682a17; Code 1932, § 2831; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1311; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-112. Lien for assessment — Enforcement.

The assessment shall be a lien on the respective tracts of land upon which it is assessed.

This lien shall be enforced in the same manner as provided for the enforcement of liens in §§ 54-12-412 — 54-12-421.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 1682a18; Code 1932, § 2832; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1312.

Collateral References.

Installment plan of payment as affecting duration of lien of special assessment. 114 A.L.R. 399.

Priority between liens for public improvements. 5 A.L.R. 1301, 99 A.L.R. 1478.

Tax lien and lien of special assessment, priority as between. 65 A.L.R. 1379.

Undivided tract, enforceability against, of special assessment levied against part of it at one rate and part at another. 112 A.L.R. 73.

Unpaid public improvement as breach of covenant or defect in vendor's title, effect of existence of lien. 72 A.L.R. 302.

54-12-113. Bonds of trustee and clerk.

The county trustee or trustees, before receiving the assessment roll or book and proceeding to the collection of the assessments, and the county clerk, before receiving the funds from the trustee or trustees, shall respectively enter into a bond in double the amount that will come into their hands, respectively, payable to the state, and conditioned for the faithful paying over and accounting for the funds arising from the assessment.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 1682a19; Code 1932, § 2833; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1313; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-114. Proceeding for cost and expense fund not to delay other proceedings — Sixty percent acreage provision.

The proceeding to create a fund for the payment of the cost and expenses shall not interfere with or delay the other proceeding, and the matter, in all other respects, may be proceeded with as provided in this part, and as provided by law; provided, that the sixty percent (60%) acreage provision of § 54-12-108 shall only apply to and be limited to a proceeding under this part.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 1682a20; Code 1932, § 2834; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1314.

54-12-115. Preliminary expenses may be paid by order of county legislative body — Refund out of assessments or bonds of petitioners.

The preliminary expense of the road improvement district provided for by this part, not including contracts for construction, may be paid by order of the county legislative body in which the lands lie, out of the general county fund.

The preliminary expense, if so paid, shall be refunded to the county out of assessments collected from the lands of the improvement district, when so collected, and if not so repaid for any reason, then to be adjudged against and collected out of the bond of the petitioners required by this part, and thus repaid to the county.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 115; Shan. Supp., § 1682a129; Code 1932, § 2944; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1315.

Collateral References.

Anticipating payment of special improvement assessment or deferred installments thereof. 96 A.L.R. 1475.

54-12-116. Contributions or donations of preliminary expenses or parts of expenses without requiring refund.

The county legislative body shall have the right to contribute, out of the general county fund, an amount it sees fit to be used in the payment of the preliminary expenses, without requiring the amount to be paid back or refunded to the county.

Where any county has previously, by order of the county legislative body, advanced or paid any of the preliminary expenses, the county legislative body may, if it sees fit, by proper order, donate the amount, or any part of the amount, and not require the amount so donated or contributed to be paid back or refunded to the county.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 116; Shan. Supp., § 1682a130; Code 1932, § 2945; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1316.

54-12-117. Petitioners required to pay preliminary expenses — Judgment on their bond.

If the county legislative body should not see fit to order the preliminary expenses be paid, and the parties to whom the expenses are owing are not willing to agree to wait until a fund for their payment can be provided by special assessments upon the district, then the county legislative body, by proper order, shall require the petitioner to pay to the county clerk a fund sufficient to pay the preliminary expenses, and the bond required of petitioners by this part shall be liable for the preliminary expenses, and judgment on the bonds may be rendered at any time by the county legislative body to the end the fund for expenses be provided, just as the county legislative body renders judgment on cost bonds, and one (1) judgment shall not prevent other judgments on the same bond, so the sum of the judgments does not exceed the penalty of the bond.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 117; Shan. Supp., § 1682a131; Code 1932, § 2946; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1317; impl am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36.

54-12-118. Fund for expenses may be paid as needed.

The fund for expenses may be paid in from time to time, under the orders of the monthly county court, as the fund may be needed.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 118; Shan. Supp., § 1682a132; Code 1932, § 2947; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1318.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-119. Refund to petitioners and their sureties paying preliminary expenses.

All sums paid by the petitioners or their sureties on their bonds shall be refunded and repaid to the person or persons paying the sums out of the funds of the improvement district when the funds have been realized under parts 2 and 4 of this chapter.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 119; Shan. Supp., § 1682a133; Code 1932, § 2948; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1319.

54-12-120. Engineer.

After the petition has been filed and bond taken and approved, the monthly county court shall at the first session thereafter, regular, special, or adjourned, and may at a later session, appoint a disinterested and competent engineer, and have placed in the engineer's hands a copy of the petition.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 1682a21; Code 1932, § 2835; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1320.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-121. Compensation of engineers.

The engineers appointed under this part by the monthly county courts shall be paid for their services at rates the courts appointing them fix; and if not fixed, at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) per day while engaged in the work. In addition, they shall be paid all actual traveling expenses, an itemized account of the expenses to be kept by them and reported and sworn to.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 106; Shan. Supp., § 1682a120; Code 1932, § 2935; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1321.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-122. Engineer to survey and locate roads and improvements.

The engineer shall proceed to examine the land described in the petition and any other lands that may be benefited by the improvement or necessary in carrying out the improvement and survey and locate the road or improvements, as may be practicable to carry out the purposes of the petition and that will be of public benefit and utility or conducive to the public welfare.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 1682a22; Code 1932, § 2836; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1322.

Collateral References.

Power and duty of highway officers as regards location or route of road to be constructed or improved. 91 A.L.R. 242.

54-12-123. Engineer's return — Contents.

The engineer shall make returns of and file the engineer's proceedings with the county clerk, which returns shall set forth the starting point, the route, the terminus or termini of the road or roads, or other improvements, such as the necessary bridges and culverts on the road or roads and the course and the length of the road or roads approximately through each tract of land as far as practicable, and the boundary of the proposed district and the description of each tract of land in the district as shown by the tax books, the names of the owners of the land as shown by the tax books, the probable cost of the improvement, and other facts and recommendations deemed material.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 12; Shan. Supp., § 1682a23; Code 1932, § 2837; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1323; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-124. Recalling engineer and appointing another.

The monthly county court may at any time recall the appointment of any engineer made under this part, if deemed advisable to do so, and appoint a replacement.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 1682a24; Code 1932, § 2838; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1324.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-125. Survey and location of roads along general course of present roads — Exception.

The roads provided for in this part shall be surveyed and located along the general course of the present roads between the termini set forth in the report, unless there is some good and sufficient reason why the course should be departed from to secure a new, better, or shorter road, or for any other good reason and having due regard to the straightening and shortening of the existing roads and the reduction of the grades on the existing roads.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 14; Shan. Supp., § 1682a25; Code 1932, § 2839; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1325.

Collateral References.

Private citizen's right to complain of rerouting of highway or removal or change of route or directional signs. 97 A.L.R. 192.

54-12-126. Engineer to submit itemized expense account or do work for stipulated sum.

The engineer may employ necessary help such as axmen, rodmen, etc., returning an itemized expense account; or the court may contract with the engineer to furnish the engineer all help needed such as axmen, rodmen, etc., and to do the entire work or any specific part of the work, for a sum agreed upon and stipulated.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 1682a26; Code 1932, § 2840; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1326.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-127. Expediency of plan — Determination by court — Submission of second plan.

Upon the filing of the return of the engineer, the monthly county court shall examine the return, and if the plan seems to be expedient and meets the approval of the court, it shall order the county clerk to cause notice to be given as provided in §§ 54-12-128 — 54-12-131; but if it does not appear to be expedient, and it is not approved, the court is authorized to direct the engineer or another selected by it to prepare another plan.

If the court deems the proposed improvement inexpedient or inadvisable after an examination of the return of the engineer or after a second further return, it may dismiss the petition and proceedings, and, in that event, it shall adjudge all costs and expenses incurred against the petitioners and the sureties on the bond.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 16; Shan. Supp., § 1682a27; Code 1932, § 2841; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1327.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-128. Summons or writ issued — Served upon whom.

When the plan, if any, has finally met the approval of the monthly county court, the court shall order the county clerk to issue a summons or writ to the sheriff of the proper county, the writ to run in the name of the state, commanding the sheriff to summon the persons named in the writ to appear before the monthly county court on the day set by it for the hearing of the petition.

The writ or summons shall name the owners of all tracts or lots of land not petitioners, within the proposed road improvement district, as shown by the tax books of the county, or by affidavit filed, and upon the persons in actual occupancy of the lands or lots, and also upon any lienholder or encumbrancer of any land in the proposed district, as shown by the county records, and shall notify them of the pendency of the petition and the prayer of the petition, but no copy of the petition shall accompany the writ.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 1682a28; Code 1932, § 2842; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1328.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-129. Service of writ — Acknowledgement.

The writ shall be served at least ten (10) days before the time set for the hearing of the matter of the petition, but shall not be issued for or served upon any of the persons described in § 54-12-128, who shall file with the clerk a statement in writing, signed by the party entering an appearance at the hearing and waiving any additional notice, or the service of the writ may be acknowledged.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 18; Shan. Supp., § 1682a29; Code 1932, § 2843; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1329.

54-12-130. Publication for nonresidents, or those whose names or residences are unknown.

In case any such owner, lienholder or encumbrancer is a nonresident of the state, or the person's name or residence cannot be ascertained after diligent inquiry, and these facts are made to appear by affidavit filed, then publication shall be made for the owner, lienholder or encumbrancer for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper of the county where the proceedings are pending, notifying the party or parties of the pendency and prayer of the petition, and to appear at the time set for the hearing on the petition, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the time set for hearing.

Proof of publication may be made as provided by law in chancery cases, and those who are actual owners, lienholders or encumbrancers may be made to appear to the clerk by the affidavit of any person acquainted with the facts or by the averments of the petition if sworn.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 1682a30; Code 1932, § 2844; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1330.

54-12-131. Writ or publication need not state contents of petition or its prayer.

The writ or summons and the publication notice need not give or set out in any detail the contents of the petition or of its prayer.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 20; Shan. Supp., § 1682a31; Code 1932, § 2845; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1331.

54-12-132. Adjournment until notice given — Jurisdiction not lost — Appearance without formal answer.

If at the time set for hearing it appears to the monthly county court that any person entitled to notice as provided in §§ 54-12-128 — 54-12-131 has not received notice, the hearing shall be adjourned until the person can be given the required notice, and the court shall not lose jurisdiction of the subject matter or of the persons already properly notified by the adjournment or postponement.

The person concerned may appear and be heard without formally answering the petition in writing; provided, that the writ or summons and the publication notice need not give or set out in any detail the contents of the petition or its prayer.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, §§ 21, 22; Shan. Supp., §§ 1682a32, 1682a33; Code 1932, §§ 2846, 2847; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1332.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-133. Claim for damages to be filed — Guardian or conservator ad litem appointed for persons under disability.

Any person claiming damages as compensation for or on account of the construction of the improvement shall file a claim in the office of the county clerk at least three (3) days prior to the day on which the petition has been set for hearing, and on failure to file the claim at the time specified shall be held to have waived any rights to the claim; provided, that if the person is an infant or adjudicated incompetent and without regular guardian or conservator, or the guardian or conservator has not been notified of the proceedings as provided in §§ 54-12-128 — 54-12-131 for notice, and the facts are made to appear by affidavit, the monthly county court shall appoint a guardian or conservator ad litem for the person, who may file the claim for damages, if deemed proper, for the person under disability, within the time allowed in this section or within three (3) days after the appointment.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 23; Shan. Supp., § 1682a34; Code 1932, § 2848; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1333; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 54.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “adjudicated incompetent and without regular guardian or conservator, or the guardian or conservator” for “a non compos mentis and without regular guardian, or the guardian” and substituted “a guardian or conservator ad litem” for “a guardian ad litem”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-134. Sufficiency of petition determined — Amendment of petition — District allowed or refused — If no claim for damages, district located and established.

The monthly county court, upon the hearing of the petition at the time set for hearing, or at the time to which the matter has been adjourned or continued, shall determine the sufficiency of the petition in form and manner, which petition may be amended at any time, as to form and substance, before final action on the petition; and if the court finds that the improvement district would not be for the public benefit or utility, or conducive to the public health or welfare, it shall dismiss the proceedings.

If the court should find the improvement conducive to the public health or welfare, or to the public benefit or utility, it shall determine and adjudge the necessity of the road improvement district.

If no claim for damages has been filed as provided for in §§ 54-12-136 — 54-12-151, the court may, if deemed advisable, locate and establish the district, or may refuse to establish the district, as the court deems best.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 24; Shan. Supp., § 1682a35; Code 1932, § 2849; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1334.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-135. Further examination and report by engineer ordered — Hearing continued until filing of report.

At the hearing, the monthly county court may order the engineer, or a new engineer appointed by it, if deemed advisable, to make further examination and report to the court as to the improvement in which the hearing shall be continued until the filing of the further report.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 25; Shan. Supp., § 1682a36; Code 1932, § 2850; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1335.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-136. Claims for damages prevent establishment of district until viewers appointed — Qualifications — Engineer to accompany viewers and give them information.

If any claims for damages have been filed, as provided in § 54-12-133, the monthly county court shall not establish the district until viewers have been appointed and have reported, and the court shall proceed to appoint three (3) viewers to assess the damages, who shall be disinterested freeholders of the county, and not related to any party interested in the proposed improvement, nor themselves interested in a like improvement, and the engineer appointed by the court shall accompany the viewers and furnish information called for by them concerning the survey of the improvement.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 26; Shan. Supp., § 1682a37; Code 1932, § 2851; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1336.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-137. Viewers upon being sworn to view premises, fix damages and report.

The viewers appointed to assess damages, after being duly sworn to act impartially and faithfully to the best of their abilities, shall proceed to view the premises and determine and fix the amount of damages to which each claimant is entitled, and file reports in writing with the county clerk showing the amount of damages to which each claimant would be entitled, because of the establishment of proposed improvement.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 27; Shan. Supp., § 1682a38; Code 1932, § 2852; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1337; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-138. Report of viewers to be filed promptly — Others appointed upon failure to act.

The report of the viewers shall be filed as soon as practicable, and if any of them fails or refuses to act, for any reason, or they do not proceed to act with promptness, the monthly county court may appoint others as viewers in the place of any or all of them.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 28; Shan. Supp., § 1682a39; Code 1932, § 2853; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1338.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-139. Value of land — Incidental benefits considered in estimating incidental damages.

In establishing the damages, the viewers shall give the value of the land proposed to be taken without deduction, but incidental benefits that may result to the owners by reason of the proposed improvement may be taken into consideration in estimating the incidental damages.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 29; Shan. Supp., § 1682a40; Code 1932, § 2854; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1339.

54-12-140. Damages awarded considered in establishing district — Location and establishment — Damages determined.

After the filing of the report of the viewers, the monthly county court shall consider the amount of damages awarded in deciding whether the road improvement district should be established. If, in its judgment, the probable cost of construction is not a greater burden than should be properly borne by the land benefited by the improvement and the improvement is conducive to the public health or welfare, or to the public benefit or utility, then the court shall locate and establish the road improvement district by proper order or judgment, to be entered of record, and the court shall then proceed to determine the amount of damages sustained by each claimant, and may hear evidence in respect to the amount of damages, and may increase or diminish the amount awarded by the viewers as deemed just and right.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 30; Shan. Supp., § 1682a41; Code 1932, § 2855; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1340.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Compensation for diminution in value of the remainder of property resulting from taking or use of adjoining land of others for the same undertaking. 59 A.L.R.3d 488.

Eminent domain: Consideration of fact that landowner's remaining land will be subject to special assessment in fixing severance damages. 59 A.L.R.3d 534.

54-12-141. Appeal from decision establishing district or allowing damages — Appeal bond.

Any party aggrieved may appeal to the circuit court from the decision of the monthly county court in establishing or refusing to establish the improvement district, or its decision in the allowance of damages.

Any party desiring to appeal shall have the right to have the benefit of the appeal at any time within five (5) days after the decision is made, without formally praying an appeal, at the same time filing a bond, to be approved by the clerk in the sum and condition prescribed in §§ 54-12-104 and 54-12-109.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 31; Shan. Supp., § 1682a42; Code 1932, § 2856; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1341.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-142. Appeal from order establishing or refusing to establish district, and penalty of appeal bond — Damages on appeal bond.

When any person opposing the creation of the district appeals from the order or decision of the monthly county court establishing or creating the district, the person shall execute bond, with good security, in the penalty of four percent (4%) of the estimated cost of the improvement, as shown by the engineer's report, and conditioned to pay all damages, actual and punitive, if any, and costs as may be suffered by the district and the petitioners for the appeal, if the appeal is not successfully prosecuted, the damages to be recovered by suit upon the bond or writ of inquiry in the circuit court that may be awarded in those cases.

If the appeal is from an order or judgment of the monthly county court refusing to establish the district, the appeal bond shall be for costs only, and the appeal bond, when made by persons asking damages or by persons opposing the establishment of the district, shall be made payable to the state for the use of those entitled, upon which bond judgment may be rendered in favor of the party or parties litigant for costs, and suits maintained for damages, actual, and also punitive, if any, in the name of the state, for the use of the district or parties entitled.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 32; Shan. Supp., § 1682a43; Code 1932, § 2857; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1342.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.